local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="fr/ysa__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yste</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ös</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysa</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usit</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yst</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yser</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n/ysa__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ös</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysa</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yste</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysit</l>
          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="avbr/yta__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öt</l>
          <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yta</l>
          <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>utit</l>
          <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yter</l>
          <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kl/yva__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öv</l>
          <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="da"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yva</l>
          <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uvit</l>
          <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yver</l>
          <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- noah -->
    <pardef n="any__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="garanti__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernas</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- noah -->

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="genom"><i>genom</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ovan"><i>ovan</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="för"><i>för</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hos"><i>hos</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="om"><i>om</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="före"><i>före</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="efter"><i>efter</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="över"><i>över</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="innan"><i>innan</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="på"><i>på</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="under"><i>under</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ut"><i>ut</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vid"><i>vid</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="å"><i>å</i><par n="any__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="garanti"><i>garanti</i><par n="garanti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="valpgaranti"><i>valpgaranti</i><par n="garanti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nybilsgaranti"><i>nybilsgaranti</i><par n="garanti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vagnskadegaranti"><i>vagnskadegaranti</i><par n="garanti__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avbryta"><i>avbr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bryta"><i>br</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="frysa"><i>fr</i><par n="fr/ysa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klyva"><i>kl</i><par n="kl/yva__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nysa"><i>n</i><par n="n/ysa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skryta"><i>skr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
